Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.419

Motorcycle profiling.

(1) The criminal justice training commission shall ensure that issues related to motorcycle profiling are addressed in basic law enforcement training and offered to in-service law enforcement officers in conjunction with existing training regarding profiling.

(2) Local law enforcement agencies shall add a statement condemning motorcycle profiling to existing policies regarding profiling.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "motorcycle profiling" means the illegal use of the fact that a person rides a motorcycle or wears motorcycle-related paraphernalia as a factor in deciding to stop and question, take enforcement action, arrest, or search a person or vehicle with or without a legal basis under the United States Constitution or Washington state Constitution.

[ 2011 c 49 s 1.]